District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4901

Seduction

Repealed.

History

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 501(a), 42 DCR 53

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-3001, 22-3002.

Editor's Notes

Former §§ 22-3001 and 22-3002 1981 Ed. had also been amended by D.C. Law 10-119, § 2.